src/closed-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON GÁVTSELÅGENAN                 !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:e#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:e#lågenan NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;       !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Ine:en#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:es#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Com:ijn#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Par:et#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Nom:e#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:ij#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:ijt#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:ijda#lågenan K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:ijn#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:ijs#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Com:ij#lågenan K ;               !^N^
                                      
LEXICON GÁKTS-LÅGENAN                 !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:a#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:a#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:áj#lågenan K ; !^N^    !XXX Spiik 77 -aj
 +Ess:an#lågenan K ;                  !^N^
                                      
LEXICON AKTSELÅGENAN                  !^N^
+Num:Q1 AVTSELÅGENAN ;                !^N^
+Num: AKTS-LÅGENAN ;                  !^N^
                                      
LEXICON AVTSELÅGENAN                  !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:e#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:e#lågenan NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;      !^N^ ^C^
 +Sg+Ine:en#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:es#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Sg+Com:ijn#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Sg+Par:et#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Nom:e#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:ij#lågenan K ;               !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:ijt#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:ijda#lågenan K ;             !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:ijn#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:ijs#lågenan K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Com:ij#lågenan K ;               !^N^
                                      
LEXICON AKTS-LÅGENAN                  !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:e#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:e#lågenan K ;                !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:áj#lågenan K ;  !^N^    !XXXSpiik 77 -aj
 +Ess:an#lågenan K ;                  !^N^
                                      
LEXICON TJUOHTECASE           !^N^
 +Num:eQ1 TJUODE- ;                     !^N^
 +Num:iQ1 TJUODI- ;                     !^N^
 +Num: TJUOHT- ;                       !^N^
                                      
LEXICON TJUODE-                       !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;                       !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: K ;                        !^N^
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;                       !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;                       !^N^
 +Sg+Par:t K ;                       !^N^
 +Pl+Nom: K ;                        !^N^

LEXICON TJUODI-
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;                       !^N^
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;                      !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;                      !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;                     !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;                      !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;                      !^N^
 +Pl+Com:j K ;                       !^N^
                                      
LEXICON TJUOHT-                       !^N^
 +Sg+Nom:e K ;                        !^N^
 +Ess:en K ;                          !^N^

LEXICON TUVSÁN				!^N^
 +Sg+Nom: K ;          !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;         !^N^
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;         !^N^  ^C^
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;            !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;   !^N^
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;           !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:is K ;            !^N^
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;            !^N^
 +Ess:in K ;                  !^N^
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;                 !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;                 !^N^
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;                 !^N^




LEXICON NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ! numeral as first part !^N^
 NAMÁK ;			   ! tuvsánjienat, logigielat, etc. !^N^
 SASJ ; !^N^
! NounSecond ;	! golmmačiegahas	!^N^
! geardásaš:geardás DABALAS ;	   
! !tuvsán#geardásaš !^N^
! jahkásaš:jahkás DABALAS ; !^N^


! Ordinal numbers
! ---------------


LEXICON VUOSTASJ				!^N^
 +Sg+Nom: K ;          !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:a K ;         !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:av K ;            !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:ij K ;   !^N^
 +Sg+Ine:in K ;           !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:is K ;            !^N^
 +Sg+Com:ijn K ;            !^N^
 +Ess:in K ;                  !^N^
 +Pl+Nom:a K ;                 !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:ij K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:ijt K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:ijda K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:ijn K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:ijs K ;                 !^N^
 +Pl+Com:ij K ;                 !^N^
 +Attr: K ;					!^N^

LEXICON TUVSÁNAT				!^N^
 +Sg+Nom:t K ;          !^N^
 +Sg+Gen:tta K ;         !^N^
 +Sg+Acc:ttav K ;            !^N^
 +Sg+Ill:ddaj K ;   !^N^
 +Sg+Ine:ttan K ;           !^N^
 +Sg+Ela:ttas K ;            !^N^
 +Sg+Com:ttajn K ;            !^N^
 +Ess:ddan K ;                  !^N^
 +Pl+Nom:tta K ;                 !^N^
 +Pl+Gen:ttaj K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Acc:ttajt K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ill:ttajda K ;              !^N^
 +Pl+Ine:ttajn K ;                !^N^
 +Pl+Ela:ttajs K ;                 !^N^
 +Pl+Com:ttaj K ;                 !^N^
 +Attr:t K ;					!^N^


! Imprecise numbers
! -----------------

LEXICON num-imprecise				!^N^
galla+Num+Sg+Nom:galla K ;
galli+Num:galli gallicase ;
galla+Num+Sg+Nom:galla K ;
galla+Num+Sg+Ill:galláj K ;
galla+Num:gall nubbecase ;
máŋŋga+Num+Sg+Nom:máŋŋga K ;
máŋŋga+Num+Sg+Acc:máŋŋga K ;
máŋŋga+Num+Sg+Ill:máŋŋgaj K ;
máŋŋga+Num:máŋga máŋŋgacase ;
moadda+Num+Sg+Nom:moadda K ;
máŋŋga+Num+Sg+Com:máŋgajn K ;
moadda+Num+Sg+Com:måttijn K ;
moadda+Num+Sg+Ill:moaddaj K ;
moadda+Num:moatte máŋŋgacase ;
moadda+Num+Sg+Acc:moadda K ;
ållo+Num+Sg+Nom:ållo K ;
ållo+Num+Sg+Ill:ålluj K ;
ållo+Num+Sg+Com:ålujn K ;
ållo+Num:ålo máŋŋgacase ;
!máŋga num-imprecise-distribution ;		!^N^
!moadde   num-imprecise-distribution ;		!^N^
!galle  num-imprecise-distribution ;		!^N^
!máŋ0ga:máŋ'ga GOLBMA ;				!^N^
!moadde:moadd GUOKTE ;				!^N^
!gal0le:gal'le GOLBMA ;				!^N^
!beal-nup+Num:beal%-nup3 # ; ! ad hoc		!^N^
biel#nup+Num+Sg+Nom:biel#nup # ;				!^N^
biel#nup+Num+Sg+Gen:biel#nup # ;				!^N^
biel#nup+Num+Sg+Acc:biel#nup # ;				!^N^
biel#nup+Num+Sg+Attr:biel#nup SASJ ;				!^N^
biel#goalmát+A+Ord:biel#goalmád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#nælját+A+Ord:biel#næljád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#vidát+A+Ord:biel#vidád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#gudát+A+Ord:biel#gudád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#giehttjit+A+Ord:biel#giehttjid3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^  
biel#gávtsát+A+Ord:biel#gávtsád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^
biel#avtsát+A+Ord:biel#avtsád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#lågåt+A+Ord:biel#lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;			 !^N^
biel#goalmát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#goalmád3 SASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#nælját+A+Ord+Attr:biel#næljád3 SASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#vidát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#vidád3 SASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#gudát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#gudád3 SASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#giehttjit+A+Ord+Attr:biel#giehttjid3 SASJ ;       !^N^  
biel#gávtsát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#gávtsád3 SASJ ;       !^N^
biel#avtsát+A+Ord+Attr:biel#avtsád3 SASJ ;       !^N^ 
biel#lågåt+A+Ord+Attr:biel#lågåd3 SASJ ;			 !^N^


!LEXICON num-imprecise-distribution		!^N^
!NUPPELOHKAIGENERATOR ;  ! máŋga#nuppe#lohkái, máŋga !^N^
!LOGIF ;        ! máŋga#logi, máŋga#lot		  !^N^
!CUODI ;        ! máŋga#čuođi			  !^N^
!NL ;           ! máŋga#nuppe#lohkái#duhát		  !^N^
!O-NL ;         ! máŋga#nuppe#lohkái#duhát		  !^N^
!O-LOGIF ;      ! máŋga#logi#duhát			  !^N^
!JUSTTUVSÁN ;    ! máŋga#duhát			  !^N^
!O-CUODI ;      ! máŋga#duhát			  !^N^




! Arabic numerals
! ---------------

LEXICON LÅGENAN					!^N^
lågenan#vuostasj+A+Ord:lågenan#vuostatj VUOSTASJ ;			 !^N^
lågenan#nuppát+A+Ord:lågenan#nuppád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
lågenan#goalmát+A+Ord:lågenan#goalmád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
lågenan#nælját+A+Ord:lågenan#næljád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
lågenan#vidát+A+Ord:lågenan#vidád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
lågenan#gudát+A+Ord:lågenan#gudád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
lågenan#giehttjit+A+Ord:lågenan#giehttjid3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^  
lågenan#gávtsát+A+Ord:lågenan#gávtsád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^
lågenan#avtsát+A+Ord:lågenan#avtsád3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
vuostasj#lågåt+A+Ord:vuostasj#lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;			 !^N^
nuppát#lågåt+A+Ord:nuppát#lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
goalmát#lågåt+A+Ord:goalmát#lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
nælját#lågåt+A+Ord:nælját#lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
vidát#lågåt+A+Ord:vidát#lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
gudát#lågåt+A+Ord:gudát#lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
giehttjit#lågåt+A+Ord:giehttjit#lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^  
gávtsát#lågåt+A+Ord:gávtsát#lågåt VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^
aktse:akts AKTSELÅGENAN ;                 !^N^
avtsát#lågåt+A+Ord:avtsát#lågåd3 VUOSTASJ ;       !^N^ 
